Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Part 3. Registration and Modification of Child-Support Order of Another
State

§ 93-25-609.
Procedure to
register child-support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child-support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in Sections 93-25-601 through 93-25-608 if the order has not been registered. A complaint for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-610.
Effect of registration
for modification.

A tribunal of this state may enforce a child-support order of another state registered for purposes of modification in the same manner as if the order had been issued by a tribunal of this state, but the registered support order may be modified only if the requirements of Section 93-25-611 or Section 93-25-613 have been met.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-611.
Modification
of child-support order of another state.

If Section 93-25-613 does not apply, upon complaint, a tribunal of this state may modify a child-support order issued in another state which is registered in this state,if,after notice and hearing, it finds that:

The following requirements are met:

Neither the child, nor the obligee who is an individual, nor the obligor resides intheissuing state;

A complainant who is a nonresident of this state seeks modification; and

The defendant is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state; or

This state is the residence of the child, or a party who is an individual is subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal of this state, and all of the parties who are individuals have filed consents in a record in the issuing tribunal for a tribunal of this state to modify the support order and assume continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Modification of a registered child-support order is subject to the same requirements, procedures and defenses that apply to the modification of an order issued by a tribunal of this state and the order may be enforcedandsatisfied in the same manner.

A tribunal of this state may not modify any aspect of a child-support order that may not be modified under the law of the issuing state, including the duration of the obligation of support. If two (2) or more tribunals have issued child-support orders for the same obligor and the same child, the order that controls and must be so recognized under Section 93-25-207 establishes the aspects of the support order which are nonmodifiable.

In a proceeding to modify a child-support order, the law of the state that is determined to have issued the initial controlling order governs the duration of the obligation of support. The obligor’s fulfillment of the duty of support established by that order precludes imposition of a further obligation of support by a tribunal of this state.

On the issuance of an order by a tribunal of this state modifying a child-support order issued in another state, the tribunal of this state becomes the tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) through (e) and Section 93-25-201(b), a tribunal of this state retains jurisdiction to modify an order issued by a tribunal of this state if:

One (1) party resides in another state; and

The other party resides outside the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-612.
Recognition
of order modified in another state.

If a child-support order issued by a tribunal of this state is modified by a tribunal of another state which assumed jurisdiction pursuant to the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state:

May enforce its order that was modified only as to arrearages and interest accruing before the modification;

May provide appropriate relief for violations of its order which occurred before the effective date of the modification; and

Shall recognize the modifying order of the other state, upon registration, for the purpose of enforcement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-613.
Jurisdiction
to modify child-support order of another state when
individual parties
reside in this state.

If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child-support order in a proceeding to register that order.

A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of Articles 1 and 2, this article, and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Articles 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 do not apply.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-614.
Notice to issuing
tribunal of modification.

Within thirty (30) days after issuance of a modified child-support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.